Hawaii statutes.
[§356D-45.5] Delinquent accounts.
(a) Notwithstanding section 40-82, the authority, with the approval of the
attorney general, may delete from its account receivable records delinquent
accounts for vacated units within state low-income public housing projects that
have been delinquent for at least 90 days.

(b) The delinquent accounts may be assigned to
a collection agency. [L 2013, c 40, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next